Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Chapter 5 Fire and Police Departments

Cross references. —

As to the appointment of fire chief and police chief, see §

15-3-204

.

For authority of board of public utilities in cities and towns to provide for a civil service status or pension system, or both, for its employees, see §

15-7-404

.

As to sheriffs, see §§

18-3-601

to

18-3-611

.

Law reviews. —

For article, “No Home On the Range For Home Rule,” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 791 (1996).